Massachusetts, session 194th, H1911.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 103 of chapter 203E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended to insert after the definition of “charitable trust”, the
following definition:- ““Durable power of attorney”, the means by which a principal shall
designate another as the principal’s attorney in fact in writing in the manner described in section
5-501 of chapter 190B.”
SECTION 2. Said section 103 of said chapter 203E is hereby further amended by adding
after the definition of “settlor”, the following definition:- ““Settlor’s agent”, a person acting on
behalf of a settlor, as an agent acting pursuant to a durable power of attorney, expressly
authorizing the agent to create a trust on the settlor’s behalf ; provided, said agent’s actions
accord with sections 5-501 to 5-507, inclusive, of chapter 190B. A settlor’s agent shall also
include a person appointed by a court of competent jurisdiction to act on behalf of the settlor in
the creation of a trust using one or more methods described in section 401.”
of 2

SECTION 3. Section 401 of said chapter 203E is hereby amended in subsection (1) by
inserting after the word “property” the following words:- “by the settlor or the settlor’s agent”.
SECTION 4. Section 402 of said chapter 203E is hereby amended to insert in subsection
(a)(1), after the word “settlor”, the following words:- “or the settlor’s agent”.
SECTION 5. Said section 402 of said chapter 203E is hereby further amended by
inserting in subsection (a)(2) after the word “settlor” the following words:- “or the settlor’s
agent”.
of 2